Georgia, session 2025_26, SB30.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 7 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
regulation of hospitals and related institutions, is amended by revising Code
Section 31-7-3.5, relating to treatment of minors for gender dysphoria and penalty for
violations, as follows:
"31-7-3.5.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
S. B. 30
- 1 -

LC 52 0659
(1) 'Hormone therapy' means therapy that adds, blocks, or removes hormones for the
purpose of assisting a minor with attempting to alter such minor's sex or to alter the
appearance of or affirm such minor's perception of his or her sex if such appearance or
perception is inconsistent with such minor's sex. Such term includes, but is not limited
to, the provision of supraphysiologic estrogen or progesterone to a minor who is male or
supraphysiologic testosterone to a minor who is female, whether such hormones are
biological, bioidentical, or synthetic.
(2) 'Puberty-blocking medication' means medication, whether biological, bioidentical,
or synthetic, used to delay or suppress pubertal development in a minor for the purpose
of assisting such minor with attempting to alter such minor's sex or to alter the
appearance of or affirm such minor's perception of his or her sex if such appearance or
perception is inconsistent with such minor's sex. Such term includes
gonadotropin-releasing hormone analogues or other synthetic drugs used in males to stop
luteinizing hormone secretion, and therefore testosterone production, and synthetic drugs
used in females to stop the production of estrogen and progesterone.
(3) 'Sex' means the biological state of being male or female, in the context of
reproductive potential or capacity, based on an individual's sex organs, chromosomes,
naturally occurring sex hormones, gonads, and internal and external genitalia present at
birth, including secondary sex characteristics.
(4) 'Sex reassignment surgery' means any surgical procedure that seeks to surgically alter
or remove healthy or nondiseased physical or anatomical characteristics or features that
are typical for an individual's sex in order to instill or create physiological or anatomical
characteristics that resemble a sex different from a minor's sex. Such term means genital
or nongenital surgery performed for the purpose of assisting a minor with attempting to
alter such minor's sex or to alter the appearance of or affirm such minor's perception of
his or her sex if such appearance or perception is inconsistent with such minor's sex. Such
term includes, but is not limited to, castration, clitorectomy, clitoroplasty, hysterectomy,
S. B. 30
- 2 -

LC 52 0659
mammoplasty, mastectomy, metoidioplasty, oophorectomy, orchiectomy, penectomy,
phalloplasty, vaginectomy, vaginoplasty, vasectomy, and vulvoplasty.
(a)(b) Except as provided in subsection (b)(c) of this Code section, none of the following
irreversible procedures or irreversible or reversible treatments therapies shall be performed
on a minor for the treatment of gender dysphoria or prescribed or administered to a minor
if such procedure or treatment is performed, prescribed, or administered for the purpose of
attempting to alter the appearance of or affirm such minor's perception of his or her sex if
such appearance or perception is inconsistent with such minor's sex in an institution
licensed pursuant to this article:
(1) Sex reassignment surgeries, or any other surgical procedures, that are performed for
the purpose of altering primary or secondary sexual sex characteristics; or
(2) Hormone replacement therapies that are prescribed or administered for the purpose
of altering primary or secondary sex characteristics or puberty-blocking medications that
are prescribed or administered for the purpose of delaying or suppressing puberty.
(b)(c) The provisions of subsection (a)(b) of this Code section shall not apply to treatment
provided pursuant to an exception contained in subsection (b)(c) of Code Section 43-34-15.
(c)(d) The department shall establish sanctions, by rule and regulation, for violations of
this Code section up to and including the revocation of an institution's permit issued
pursuant to Code Section 31-7-3.
(e) Nothing in this Code section shall preclude a parent or guardian of a minor on or to
whom a procedure or treatment is performed, prescribed, or administered in violation of
this Code section from seeking civil or criminal remedy under any other provision of law."
SECTION 2.
Article 1 of Chapter 34 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
Georgia Composite Medical Board, is amended by revising Code Section 43-34-15, relating
S. B. 30
- 3 -

LC 52 0659
to prohibition on certain therapies and procedures for treatment of gender dysphoria in
minors, regulations, exceptions, and accountability, as follows:
"43-34-15.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Hormone therapy' means therapy that adds, blocks, or removes hormones for the
purpose of assisting a minor with attempting to alter such minor's sex or to alter the
appearance of or affirm such minor's perception of his or her sex if such appearance or
perception is inconsistent with such minor's sex. Such term includes, but is not limited
to, the provision of supraphysiologic estrogen or progesterone to a minor who is a male
or supraphysiologic testosterone to a minor who is a female, whether such hormones are
biological, bioidentical, or synthetic.
(2) 'Puberty-blocking medication' means medication, whether biological, bioidentical,
or synthetic, used to delay or suppress pubertal development in a minor for the purpose
of assisting such minor with attempting to alter such minor's sex or to alter the
appearance of or affirm such minor's perception of his or her sex if such appearance or
perception is inconsistent with such minor's sex. Such term includes
gonadotropin-releasing hormone analogues or other synthetic drugs used in males to stop
luteinizing hormone secretion, and therefore testosterone production, and synthetic drugs
used in females to stop the production of estrogen and progesterone.
(3) 'Sex' means the biological state of being male or female, in the context of
reproductive potential or capacity, based on an individual's sex organs, chromosomes,
naturally occurring sex hormones, gonads, and internal and external genitalia present at
birth, including secondary sex characteristics.
(4) 'Sex reassignment surgery' means any surgical procedure that seeks to surgically alter
or remove healthy or nondiseased physical or anatomical characteristics or features that
are typical for an individual's sex in order to instill or create physiological or anatomical
characteristics that resemble a sex different from a minor's sex. Such term means genital
S. B. 30
- 4 -

LC 52 0659
or nongenital surgery performed for the purpose of assisting a minor with attempting to
alter such minor's sex or to alter the appearance of or affirm such minor's perception of
his or her sex if such appearance or perception is inconsistent with such minor's sex.
Such term includes, but is not limited to, castration, clitorectomy, clitoroplasty,
hysterectomy, mammoplasty, mastectomy, metoidioplasty, oophorectomy, orchiectomy,
100 penectomy, phalloplasty, vaginectomy, vaginoplasty, vasectomy, and vulvoplasty.
101 (a)(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b)(c) of this Code section, the following
102 irreversible procedures and irreversible or reversible treatments therapies performed on a
103 minor for the treatment of gender dysphoria or prescribed or administered to a minor if
104 such procedure or treatment is performed, prescribed, or administered for the purpose of
105 attempting to alter the appearance of or affirm such minor's perception of his or her sex if
106 such appearance or perception is inconsistent with such minor's sex are prohibited in this
107 state:
108 (1) Sex reassignment surgeries, or any other surgical procedures, that are performed for
109 the purpose of altering primary or secondary sexual sex characteristics; and
110 (2) Hormone replacement therapies that are prescribed or administered for the purpose
111 of altering primary or secondary sex characteristics or puberty-blocking medications that
112 are prescribed or administered for the purpose of delaying or suppressing puberty.
113 (b)(c) The board shall adopt rules and regulations regarding the prohibitions contained in
114 subsection (a)(b) of this Code section, which shall contain limited exceptions for:
115 (1) Treatments for medical conditions other than gender dysphoria or for the purpose of
116 sex reassignment where such treatments are deemed medically necessary;
117 (2)(1) Treatments for individuals born with a medically verifiable disorder of sex
118 development, including individuals born with ambiguous genitalia or chromosomal
119 abnormalities resulting in ambiguity regarding the individual's biological sex; and
120 (3)(2) Treatments for individuals with partial androgen insensitivity syndrome; and
S. B. 30
- 5 -

LC 52 0659
121 (4) Continued treatment of minors who are, prior to July 1, 2023, being treated with
122 irreversible hormone replacement therapies.
123 (c)(d) A licensed physician who violates this Code section shall be held administratively
124 accountable to the board for such violation.
125 (e) Nothing in this Code section shall preclude a parent or guardian of a minor on or to
126 whom a procedure or treatment is performed, prescribed, or administered in violation of
127 this Code section from seeking civil or criminal remedy under any other provision of law."
128 SECTION 3.
129 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 30
- 6 -